Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 3
OFFENSES - POLITICAL PARTY ORGANIZATION

1-13-301. Fraud at precinct caucus, assembly, or convention.

Any person in authority at any precinct caucus, assembly, or convention who in any manner dishonestly, corruptly, or fraudulently performs any act devolving on him or her by virtue of the position of trust which he or she fills or knowingly aids or abets any other person to do any fraudulent, dishonest, or corrupt act or thing in reference to the carrying on of any precinct caucus, assembly, or convention or the ascertaining or promulgating of its true will upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3126, § 16, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-112 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-302. Fraudulent voting in precinct caucus, assembly, or convention.

Any person who fraudulently participates and votes in a precinct caucus, assembly, or convention when he or she is not a member of the political party holding the precinct caucus, assembly, or convention, as shown in the statewide voter registration system upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 431, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 588, § 69, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3126, § 17, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-13-119 as it existed prior to 1980.

1-13-303. Other offenses at precinct caucus, assembly, or convention.

It is unlawful for any person at any precinct caucus, assembly, or convention:

To fraudulently vote more than once;

To knowingly hand in two or more ballots deceitfully folded together;

To knowingly procure, aid, counsel, or advise another to vote or attempt to vote fraudulently or corruptly;

To falsely personate any elector and vote under his name or under an assumed name;

To fraudulently procure, aid, abet, or encourage, directly or indirectly, any person to attempt to falsely personate any elector or to vote under an assumed name;

To influence any voter in the casting of his vote by bribery, duress, or any other corrupt or fraudulent means; or

To receive any money or valuable thing, or the promise of either, for casting his vote for or against any person or measure or to offer his vote for or against any person or measure in consideration of money or other valuable thing, or the promise of either.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 432, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3126, § 18, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 1-13-120 and 1-30-127 as they existed prior to 1980.